District of Columbia statutes.
3-1206.04

Authorized acts.

An advanced practice registered nurse may:

(1)

Initiate, monitor, and alter drug therapies;

(2)

Initiate appropriate therapies or treatments;

(3)

Make referrals for appropriate therapies or treatments; and

(4)

Perform additional functions within his or her specialty determined in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the board.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 604, 33 DCR 729
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-247, § 2(s), 42 DCR 457

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3306.4.